Wyoming, session 2025, SF0005.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-5-928(f) by creating a new
paragraph (v) is amended to read:
31-5-928. General lighting restrictions; authorized
emergency vehicles.
(f) The following vehicles are authorized to display
flashing white and amber lights in addition to those
otherwise authorized by law:
(v) Vehicles owned by, leased by or registered
to a public school district that are not school buses and
that are used to transport children to or from school or in
connection with school activities.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0005
ENROLLED ACT NO. 45, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
2